New York, session 2025-2026, S8226.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 618 of the laws of 1998, amending the 2 general municipal law and the education law relating to disposal of 3 surplus computer equipment by political subdivisions, as amended by 4 chapter 196 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire July 1, 6 [2025] 2028 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 7 deemed repealed. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10898-01-5